utilities/dictionaries/eu_EU-Basque.aff
FLAG num
SFX 188 0 dakarte/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakartzaa/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 dakartzad/1,400 .
SFX 188 0 dakartzagu .
SFX 188 0 dakartzagu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakartzak .
SFX 188 0 dakartzak/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakartzana/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 dakartzan .
SFX 188 0 dakartzan/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakartzate .
SFX 188 0 dakartzate/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakartzat .
SFX 188 0 dakartzat/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakartzazue .
SFX 188 0 dakartzazue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakartzazu .
SFX 188 0 dakartzazu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakartza .
SFX 188 0 dakartza/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakart .
SFX 188 0 dakart/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiad/1,400 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiagu .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiagu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiate .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiate/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiat .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiat/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkia/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkidaa/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkidak .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkidak/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkidana/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkidan .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkidan/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkidate .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkidate/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkidazue .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkidazue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkidazu .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkidazu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkid/1,400 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiea/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkied/1,400 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiegu .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiegu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiek .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiek/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiena/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkien .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkien/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiete .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiet .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiet/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiezue .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiezue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiezu .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiezu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkie .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkie/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkigua/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiguk .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiguk/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiguna/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkigun .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkigun/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkigute .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkigute/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiguzue .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiguzue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiguzu .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiguzu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkigu .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkigu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkik .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkik/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkinad/1,400 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkinagu .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkinagu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkinate .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkinate/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkinat .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkinat/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkina/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkin .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkin/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkioa/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiod/1,400 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiogu .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiogu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiok .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiok/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiona/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkion .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkion/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiote .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiote/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiot .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiot/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiozue .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiozue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiozu .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkiozu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkio .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkio/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkit .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkit/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkizud/1,400 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkizued/1,400 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkizuegu .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkizuegu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkizuete .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkizuete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkizuet .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkizuet/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkizue .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkizue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkizugu .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkizugu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkizute .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkizute/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkizut .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkizut/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkizu .
SFX 188 0 dakarzkizu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzue .
SFX 188 0 dakarzue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakarzu .
SFX 188 0 dakarzu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakar .
SFX 188 0 dakarr/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 dakiake .
SFX 188 0 dakiake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 dakia/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 dakidake .
SFX 188 0 dakidake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 dakid/1,400 .
SFX 188 0 dakieke .
SFX 188 0 dakieke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 dakie .
SFX 188 0 dakie/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakie .
SFX 188 0 dakiguke .
SFX 188 0 dakiguke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 dakigu .
SFX 188 0 dakigu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakigu .
SFX 188 0 dakik .
SFX 188 0 dakik/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakik .
SFX 188 0 dakinake .
SFX 188 0 dakinake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 dakina/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 dakin .
SFX 188 0 dakin/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakin .
SFX 188 0 dakioke .
SFX 188 0 dakioke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 dakio .
SFX 188 0 dakio/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakio .
SFX 188 0 dakite .
SFX 188 0 dakite/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakit .
SFX 188 0 dakit/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakit .
SFX 188 0 dakizkiake .
SFX 188 0 dakizkiake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 dakizkia/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 dakizkidake .
SFX 188 0 dakizkidake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 dakizkid/1,400 .
SFX 188 0 dakizkieke .
SFX 188 0 dakizkieke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 dakizkie .
SFX 188 0 dakizkie/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakizkie .
SFX 188 0 dakizkiguke .
SFX 188 0 dakizkiguke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 dakizkigu .
SFX 188 0 dakizkigu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakizkigu .
SFX 188 0 dakizkik .
SFX 188 0 dakizkik/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakizkik .
SFX 188 0 dakizkinake .
SFX 188 0 dakizkinake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 dakizkina/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 dakizkin .
SFX 188 0 dakizkin/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakizkin .
SFX 188 0 dakizkioke .
SFX 188 0 dakizkioke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 dakizkio .
SFX 188 0 dakizkio/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakizkio .
SFX 188 0 dakizkite .
SFX 188 0 dakizkite/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakizkit .
SFX 188 0 dakizkit/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakizkit .
SFX 188 0 dakizkizueke .
SFX 188 0 dakizkizueke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 dakizkizue .
SFX 188 0 dakizkizue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakizkizue .
SFX 188 0 dakizkizuke .
SFX 188 0 dakizkizuke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 dakizkizu .
SFX 188 0 dakizkizu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakizkizu .
SFX 188 0 dakizki .
SFX 188 0 dakizki/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 dakizueke .
SFX 188 0 dakizueke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 dakizue .
SFX 188 0 dakizue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakizue .
SFX 188 0 dakizuke .
SFX 188 0 dakizuke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 dakizu .
SFX 188 0 dakizu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakizu .
SFX 188 0 daki .
SFX 188 0 daki/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 dakusaa/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 dakusad/1,400 .
SFX 188 0 dakusagu .
SFX 188 0 dakusagu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakusak .
SFX 188 0 dakusak/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakusana/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 dakusan .
SFX 188 0 dakusan/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakusate .
SFX 188 0 dakusate/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakusat .
SFX 188 0 dakusat/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakusazue .
SFX 188 0 dakusazue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakusazu .
SFX 188 0 dakusazu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakusa .
SFX 188 0 dakusa/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakuskia/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 dakuskid/1,400 .
SFX 188 0 dakuskigu .
SFX 188 0 dakuskigu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakuskik .
SFX 188 0 dakuskik/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakuskina/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 dakuskin .
SFX 188 0 dakuskin/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakuskite .
SFX 188 0 dakuskite/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakuskit .
SFX 188 0 dakuskit/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dakuskizue .
SFX 188 0 dakuskizue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakuskizu .
SFX 188 0 dakuskizu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dakuski .
SFX 188 0 dakuski/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 dantzua/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 dantzud/1,400 .
SFX 188 0 dantzugu .
SFX 188 0 dantzugu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dantzuk .
SFX 188 0 dantzuk/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dantzuna/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 dantzun .
SFX 188 0 dantzun/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dantzute .
SFX 188 0 dantzute/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dantzut .
SFX 188 0 dantzut/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dantzuzkia/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 dantzuzkid/1,400 .
SFX 188 0 dantzuzkigu .
SFX 188 0 dantzuzkigu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dantzuzkik .
SFX 188 0 dantzuzkik/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dantzuzkina/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 dantzuzkin .
SFX 188 0 dantzuzkin/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dantzuzkite .
SFX 188 0 dantzuzkite/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dantzuzkit .
SFX 188 0 dantzuzkit/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 dantzuzkizue .
SFX 188 0 dantzuzkizue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dantzuzkizu .
SFX 188 0 dantzuzkizu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dantzuzki .
SFX 188 0 dantzuzki/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 dantzuzue .
SFX 188 0 dantzuzue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dantzuzu .
SFX 188 0 dantzuzu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 dantzu .
SFX 188 0 dantzu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 darabila/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 darabild/1,400 .
SFX 188 0 darabilgu .
SFX 188 0 darabilgu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 darabilkiad/1,400 .
SFX 188 0 darabilkiagu .
SFX 188 0 darabilkiagu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 darabilkiate .
SFX 188 0 darabilkiate/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 darabilkiat .
SFX 188 0 darabilkiat/1,402 .
